Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB811.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Fraudulent Misrepresentation of a Candidate Prevention Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence." As follows:(1) A machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments, including the ability to:<--12345678910111213141516 (i) perceive real and virtual environments;(ii) abstract perceptions made under subparagraph (i) into models through analysis in an automated manner; and(iii) use model inference to formulate options for information or action based on outcomes under subparagraphs (i) and (ii).(2) The term includes generative artificial intelligence."Campaign advertisement." A public advertisement for the purposes of influencing public opinion with respect to legislative, administrative or electoral matters utilizing a medium that includes mailings, emails, telephone calls, radio, television, billboards, yard signs or other electronic media."Candidate." As defined in section 102(a) of the Pennsylvania Election Code, including a candidate for President of the United States. The term includes a current or former candidate."Covered person." Any of the following:(1) A candidate.(2) A firm, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, organization or similar entity.(3) A political committee, including a political action committee, a political party or a political body.(4) A political action committee that only receives contributions to make independent expenditures.(5) A foreign government, including any agency or instrumentality thereof.(6) An employee, contractor or individual acting at the behest of an entity specified under paragraph (1), (2), (3), 20250HB0811PN1819 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) or (5) or an officer, director, employee, owner, shareholder or contractor thereof."DEEPFAKE." ANY VIDEO RECORDING, MOTION-PICTURE FILM, SOUND RECORDING, ELECTRONIC IMAGE OR PHOTOGRAPH OR ANY TECHNOLOGICAL REPRESENTATION OF SPEECH OR CONDUCT SUBSTANTIALLY DERIVATIVE THEREOF:(1) THAT IS SO REALISTIC THAT A REASONABLE PERSON WOULD BELIEVE IT DEPICTS SPEECH OR CONDUCT OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO DID NOT IN FACT ENGAGE IN THE SPEECH OR CONDUCT; AND(2) THE PRODUCTION OF WHICH WAS SUBSTANTIALLY DEPENDENT UPON TECHNICAL MEANS RATHER THAN THE ABILITY OF ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL TO PHYSICALLY OR VERBALLY IMPERSONATE THE INDIVIDUAL."DIGITAL CONTENT PROVENANCE." FACTUAL INFORMATION THAT DETAILS A DIGITAL RESOURCE'S CREATOR, ORIGIN, CONTEXT, HISTORY AND EDITING PROCESS AND CONFORMS TO AN OPEN INDUSTRY TECHNICAL STANDARD."Disseminate." To produce, publish, distribute, broadcast, publicize, display, transmit or otherwise publicly share."Election." As defined in section 102(f) of the Pennsylvania Election Code."Generative artificial intelligence." The class of models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic content."INTERACTIVE COMPUTER SERVICE." ANY INFORMATION SERVICE, SYSTEM OR ACCESS SOFTWARE PROVIDER THAT PROVIDES OR ENABLES COMPUTER ACCESS BY MULTIPLE USERS TO A COMPUTER SERVER, INCLUDING SPECIFICALLY A SERVICE OR SYSTEM THAT PROVIDES ACCESS TO THE INTERNET AND SUCH SYSTEMS OPERATED OR SERVICES OFFERED BY LIBRARIES OR EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS.20250HB0811PN1819 - 3 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Pennsylvania Election Code." The act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code."Public office." As defined in section 102(s) of the Pennsylvania Election Code."Synthetic content." Information such as images, videos, audio clips and text that have been significantly modified or generated by algorithms, including artificial intelligence.Section 3. Civil liability for fraudulent misrepresentation of candidates.(a) Liability.--A covered person shall be liable for fraudulent misrepresentation of a candidate if, within 90 days before an election and with willful or reckless disregard for the possibility of influencing the outcome of an election, the covered person KNOWINGLY AND INTENTIONALLY disseminates or causes to be disseminated a campaign advertisement that contains an artificially generated impersonation of a candidate for public office with the intent to misrepresent the words, actions or beliefs of the candidate A DEEPFAKE.(b) Clear and conspicuous disclosure.--A covered person shall not be liable for a fraudulent misrepresentation under subsection (a) if the campaign advertisement contains a clear and conspicuous disclosure. The disclosure under this subsection must:(1) State that the campaign advertisement contains synthetic DEEPFAKE content of a candidate for public office. The disclosure shall be in substantially the following form:This (text/image/video/sound) (IMAGE/VIDEO/SOUND/CONTENT) CONTAINS DEEPFAKE CONTENT AND has been manipulated or generated using synthetic content TO DEPICT SPEECH OR CONDUCT THAT DID NOT 20250HB0811PN1819 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OCCUR.(2) Be displayed in the first instance when EACH TIME the campaign advertisement is presented.(3) Be presented in a manner reasonably understandable and readily noticeable. The following shall apply:(i) For content presented in static images, the disclosure shall be in written form, in a size and font that is easily readable by the average viewer, accessible screen readers and other technology to assist visually impaired users.(ii) For content presented in video formats, the disclosure shall appear for the duration of the video in a format that is easily readable by the average viewer. The disclosure shall be read in a clearly spoken manner and in a pitch and at a speed that can be easily heard by the average listener at the beginning and end of the video.(iii) For content that consists of only audio, the disclosure shall be read in a clearly spoken manner and in a pitch and at a speed that can be easily heard by the average listener at the beginning and end of the audio, and, if the audio is more than two minutes in length, interspersed within the audio at intervals of not more than two minutes each.(4) BE IN THE SAME LANGUAGE AS USED IN THE CAMPAIGN ADVERTISEMENT. FOR CONTENT PRESENTED IN STATIC IMAGES OR VIDEO FORMATS, IF THE LANGUAGE USED IS NOT ENGLISH, THE DISCLOSURE MUST APPEAR IN BOTH THE LANGUAGE USED AND IN ENGLISH.(C) DIGITAL CONTENT PROVENANCE.--A COVERED PERSON SHALL 20250HB0811PN1819 - 5 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ENSURE THAT CONTENT IN A CAMPAIGN ADVERTISEMENT CONTAINING A DISCLOSURE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) CARRIES EMBEDDED TAMPER-EVIDENT DIGITAL CONTENT PROVENANCE FOR THE DEEPFAKE CONTENT THAT DISCLOSES:(1) THE INITIAL AUTHORITY AND CREATOR OF THE CONTENT.(2) ANY SUBSEQUENT ENTITIES THAT EDITED, ALTERED OR OTHERWISE MODIFIED THE CONTENT.(3) ANY USE OF DIGITAL TECHNOLOGY IN GENERATING OR MODIFYING THE SUBSTANTIVE CONTENT.(c) (D) Relief.--A candidate for public office aggrieved by a covered person under subsection (a) may bring a civil action against the covered person in a court of competent jurisdiction and shall be entitled to recover punitive damages, reasonable attorney fees and other reasonably related litigation costs incurred relating to the civil action. Upon a showing of cause for the issuance of injunctive relief, a court may issue a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction or permanent injunction as the court deems appropriate. During any period that a civil action under this subsection is pending, a court may order the immediate removal of the campaign advertisement and cessation of the activity forming the basis of the complaint.(d) (E) Civil penalties.--(1) In addition to any other judgment or relief awarded under subsection (c) (D) to an aggrieved candidate for public office, a court may, for each campaign advertisement containing unique synthetic DEEPFAKE content, impose a civil penalty on the covered person for each day the fraudulent misrepresentation is disseminated in an amount up to:(i) $15,000 when the campaign advertisement contains 20250HB0811PN1819 - 6 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unique synthetic DEEPFAKE content of a candidate for a municipal public office in this Commonwealth for which the candidate files with the county board of elections under section 913 of the Pennsylvania Election Code.(ii) Except as provided in subparagraph (iii), $50,000 when the campaign advertisement contains unique synthetic DEEPFAKE content of a candidate for a State public office in this Commonwealth for which the candidate files with the Secretary of the Commonwealth under section 913 of the Pennsylvania Election Code.(iii) $250,000 when the campaign advertisement contains unique synthetic DEEPFAKE content of a candidate for President of the United States, VICE PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES, presidential elector, the United States Senate or the United States House of Representatives.(2) For a covered person that is a political action committee that only receives contributions to make independent expenditures, the court may impose twice the amounts specified under paragraph (1) on the covered person.(e) (F) Frivolous actions.--If a court determines that a civil action brought under this section is frivolous, the court shall issue an order suspending the covered person's obligation to respond to the civil action and shall order the candidate to show cause why the civil action should not be dismissed. If the candidate fails to respond to the court or the candidate's response to the court confirms that the civil action is frivolous, the court shall dismiss the civil action and may award reasonable attorney fees and other reasonably related litigation costs incurred relating to the civil action to the covered person and may impose appropriate sanctions against the 20250HB0811PN1819 - 7 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 candidate and the candidate's attorney.(f) (G) Defense.--It shall be a defense to a civil action brought under this section that the covered person disseminated the campaign advertisement containing synthetic DEEPFAKE content with the consent of the candidate if the covered person who disseminated the campaign advertisement can establish that the candidate has given the candidate's express, written consent.(g) Location.--A covered person may be found liable in a civil action brought under this section if the covered person or candidate is located within this Commonwealth.(h) Applicability.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to any of the following:(1) A law enforcement officer engaged in the performance of the law enforcement officer's official duties.(2) A streaming service, radio or television broadcaster, including a cable or satellite television operator, programmer or producer that disseminates a campaign advertisement provided by another person.(3) A newspaper, magazine or other periodical of general circulation, including an Internet or electronic publication, which routinely carries news and commentary of general interest and that disseminates a campaign advertisement provided by another person.(4) An entity under paragraph (2) or (3) when the entity is paid to disseminate a campaign advertisement with the consent of the candidate as specified under subsection (f) (G).(5) An interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 230 (relating to protection for private blocking and screening of offensive material).20250HB0811PN1819 - 8 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) An Internet service provider, cloud provider, cybersecurity provider, communication service provider or telecommunications network.(7) Content that constitutes satire or parody which is substantially dependent on the ability of an individual to impersonate a candidate physically or verbally and not upon generative artificial intelligence TECHNOLOGY.(8) THE PROVIDER OR DEVELOPER OF TECHNOLOGY USED IN THE CREATION OF THE DEEPFAKE.(i) Construction.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to:(1) restrict the ability of a covered person to detect, prevent, respond to or protect against security incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment, malicious or deceptive activities or any illegal activity, preserve the integrity or security of systems or investigate, report or prosecute those responsible for any such action; or(2) limit or preclude a candidate from securing or recovering any other available remedies at law or in equity.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0811PN1819 - 9 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021